Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1611
Support and paternity matters; protection orders; referral or assignment.

A district court, separate juvenile court, or county court may by rule or order refer or assign any and all matters regarding the establishment, modification, enforcement, and collection of child, spousal, or medical support, paternity matters, and domestic abuse protection orders issued under the Protection Orders Act to a child support referee for findings and recommendations.

Laws 1989, LB 265, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 715, § 23;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 51;

Laws 2017, LB289, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 45.

Protection Orders Act, see section 26-101.